Rhode Island, session 2025, SB72.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-6-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-6 entitled "Registration
Fees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-6-8. Disabled veterans.
(a) Any veteran who has been honorably discharged from the service of the armed forces
or the Merchant Marine of the United States in any of the wars or campaigns in which the United
States has been engaged and who, while engaged in these wars or campaigns or as a result of
engagement in these wars or campaigns, by reason of amputation, has lost one or both of the
veteran’s arms, hands, feet, or legs, or who, by reason of other permanent injury, has lost the use
of one or both of the veteran’s arms, hands, feet, or legs, or to whom has been granted a motor
vehicle under chapter 870-2D, United States Public Laws 663, enacted 1946, 79th Congress, or has
suitable documentation from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs to establish that the veteran:
(1) Has a combined service connected disability rating of one hundred percent (100%); or
(2) Is considered “individually unemployable” due to the veteran’s service-connected
disability, shall be exempt from the payment of any fee for the annual registration of and a license
to operate that motor vehicle.
(b) The administrator for the division of motor vehicles shall issue to an eligible veteran
for use on an automobile, or on a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of twelve thousand
pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less, registration plates designated “Disabled Veteran.” Provided that:
(1) Upon certification that the veteran is no longer able to operate a vehicle, the "Disabled

Veteran" plates may be transferred, during their lifetime, to the veteran's spouse; and
(2) Upon the death of the holder initial registrant of the “Disabled Veteran” plates, the
plates may be transferred to the veteran’s surviving spouse for the spouse’s lifetime or until the
spouse remarries. Only one set of
(3) “Disabled Veteran” plates shall be issued to an eligible veteran and or their spouse as
provided for in subsection (b)(1) of this section only after certification of eligibility from the
Veterans’ Administration or other satisfactory documentation of eligibility is presented.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000236
========
LC000236 - Page 2 of 3